Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-802
Leasehold interest; oil and gas operations; labor and material; lien.

Any person, who shall under contract with the owner of any leasehold interest held for oil or gas purposes or the owner of any pipeline perform any labor, furnish any material or services used or employed or furnished to be used or employed in the drilling or operating of any oil or gas well upon such leasehold interest or in the construction of any pipeline or in the constructing of any material so used, employed, or furnished to be used or employed, shall be entitled to a lien under sections 57-801 to 57-820. Any such person shall be entitled to such lien whether or not a producing well is obtained and whether or not such material is incorporated in or becomes a part of the completed oil well, gas well, or pipeline, for the amount due him for the performance of such labor or the furnishing of such material or services. This shall include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, transportation and mileage charges connected therewith.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 2, p. 808.

Oil well lien was obtained under contract with owner of leasehold interest. Western Pipe & Supply, Inc. v. Heart Mountain Oil Co., Inc., 179 Neb. 858, 140 N.W.2d 813 (1966).